Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2170.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "tax credit" in section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Tax credit." A tax credit authorized under any of the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 following:* * *(14.2) Article XVIII-I.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVIII-IEMPLOYER BLOOD DONATION TAX CREDITSection 1801-I. Scope of article.This article relates to the employer blood donation tax credit.Section 1802-I. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Blood donation." The voluntary and uncompensated donation of whole blood or specific components of blood, by an employee, drawn for use by a nonprofit blood bank organization as part of a blood drive."Blood drive." A function held at a specific date and time that is organized by a nonprofit blood bank organization in coordination with an employer or group of employers and is closed to nonemployees."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Employee." An individual employed by an employer."Employer." A sole proprietor, general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, corporation or other legally recognized business entity."Tax credit." An employer blood donation tax credit authorized under section 1803-I."Verified donation." A blood donation made by an employee 20260HB2170PN2823 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 during a blood drive that can be documented by an employer.Section 1803-I. Employer blood donation tax credit.(a) Establishment.--For tax years 2025 through 2029, an employer that provides one or more paid leaves of absence to an employee for the specific purpose of a verified donation of blood as part of a blood drive provided by a Commonwealth nonprofit blood donation organization shall qualify for the employer blood donation tax credit. An employer that qualifies for the tax credit may apply the tax credit against tax due under Article III, IV, VII, VIII, IX or XV.(b) Amount of tax credit.--The tax credit authorized by subsection (a) shall be equal to $20 for each verified donation.(c) Limitations.--(1) The tax credit shall not be used to reduce the tax liability of the taxpayer to less than $0.(2) The total aggregate amount of all tax credits approved may not exceed $500,000 in a fiscal year.Section 1804-I. Regulations.The department may determine, by regulation, documentation required to implement this article and other regulations the department deems necessary to implement this article.Section 3. The addition of Article XVIII-I of the act shall apply to taxable years commencing after December 31, 2025.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2170PN2823 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324